Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 8. Dust Control.

§ 45.2-925.
Control of dust and combustible material.

Where a surface coal mining operation raises an excessive amount of dust into the air, such dust shall be allayed at its sources by the use of water, water with a wetting agent added to it, or another effective method.

Drilling in rock shall be done wet or other means of dust control shall be used.

Loose coal, coal dust, oil, grease, or other combustible materials shall not be permitted to accumulate excessively on equipment or surface structures.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-77.1, 45-85.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-66, 45.1-87; 1979, c. 315; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.278; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”